District of Columbia statutes.
8-2210

Complaints.

The Department shall keep a record of any written or oral complaints lodged against a wildlife control services provider and shall document action taken by the Department in response to the complaint.

History

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 11, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990